nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Voedingsbenodigdheden: Spenen en melkzakjes voor babyflessen; Zuigflessen; Slabbetjes; Voederbakken; Voederborden; Voederlepels; Besteksets; Tuitbekers
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Essentiels pour l’alimentation: Tétines et sacs pour biberons; Biberons; Bavoirs; Bols alimentaires; Assiettes alimentaires; Cuillères alimentaires; Ménagères; Tasses à bec
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Základní potřeby ke krmení: Dudlíky na kojenecké lahve; Kojenecké lahve; Dětské bryndáky; Misky na krmení; Talíře na krmení; Lžíce na krmení; Příborové sady; Hrníčky s pítkem
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Nødvendigheter for fôring: Tuter og innlegg for babyflasker; Babyflasker; Smekker; Fôringsskål; Fôringsplater; Fôringsskjeer; Bestikksett; Drikkekopper
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Прибори за хранене на бебета: Биберони и накрайници за бебешки шишета; Бебешки шишета; Лигавници; Купички за хранене; Чинии за хранене; Лъжици за хранене; Комплекти прибори за хранене; Чашки за бебета
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Nødvendigheder til bespisning: Sutteflaske – sut; Sutteflasker; Savlesmække; Babyskåle; Babytallerkener; Babyskeer; Spisebestiksæt; Tudkop
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Nutrition: Sugnappar och insatser till nappflaskor; Nappflaskor; Haklappar; Matskålar; Mattallrikar; Matskedar; Bestickset; Barnmuggar
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Būtiniausi maitinimo reikmenys: Kūdikių buteliukų čiulptukai ir įdėklai; Kūdikių buteliukai; Seilinukai; Maitinimo dubenys; Maitinimo lėkštės; Maitinimo šaukštai; Stalo įrankių rinkiniai; Gertuvės kūdikiams
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 餵食必需品: 奶瓶內袋和奶嘴; 奶瓶; 圍兜; 餵食碗; 餵食盤; 餵食匙; 扁平餐具組; 訓練杯
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อุปกรณ์สำคัญในการป้อนอาหารเด็ก: จุกและที่รองขวดนมสำหรับทารก; ขวดนมสำหรับทารก; ผ้ากันเปื้อน; ชามป้อนอาหารเด็ก; จานป้อนอาหารเด็ก; ช้อนป้อนอาหารเด็ก; ชุดอุปกรณ์ที่ใช้บนโต๊ะอาหาร; ถ้วยหัดดื่ม
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Syöttämisen perustarvikkeet: Pullotutit ja tuttipullon pussit; Tuttipullot; Ruokalaput; Syöttökupit; Syöttölautaset; Syöttölusikat; Ruokailuvälinesetit; Nokkamukit
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Essencial para alimentação: Capas e tetinas para biberões de bebé; Biberões de bebé; Babetes; Taças de alimentação; Pratos de alimentação; Colheres de alimentação; Conjuntos de talheres; Copos para bebé
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Osnovni pripomočki za hranjenje: Cuclji in vložki za stekleničke; Otroške stekleničke; Slinčki; Sklede za hranjenje; Krožniki za hranjenje; Žlice za hranjenje; Kompleti jedilnega pribora; Otroški lončki za pitje
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Articole esențiale pentru hrănire: Tetine și inserții pentru biberoane; Biberoane; Bavete; Boluri pentru hrănire; Farfurii pentru hrănire; Linguri pentru hrănire; Seturi de veselă; Căni cu pai
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Etetőkellékek: Cumisüvegbimbók és -betétek; Cumisüvegek; Előkék; Etetőtálak; Etetőtányérok; Etetőkanalak; Evőeszköz-készletek; Itatópoharak
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Základné potreby na kŕmenie: Cumlíky a vložky do dojčenských fliaš; Dojčenské fľaše; Podbradníky; Dojčenské misky; Dojčenské taniere; Dojčenské lyžičky; Súpravy príborov; Dojčenské hrnčeky
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Beslenme Gereçleri: Biberon Emzikleri ve Astarları; Biberonlar; Mama Önlükleri; Beslenme Kapları; Beslenme Plakaları; Beslenme Kaşıkları; Çatal Bıçak Setleri; Suluklar
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Artículos esenciales de alimentación: Tetinas y fundas para biberones; Biberones; Baberos; Tazones; Platos; Cucharas; Cubiertos; Vasitos para bebés
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Podstawowe artykuły do karmienia niemowląt: Smoczki i wkładki do butelek; Butelki dla niemowląt; Śliniaki; Miseczki do karmienia; Talerzyki do karmienia; Łyżeczki do karmienia; Zestawy sztućców; Kubki-niekapki
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 유아식 필수품: 젖병 꼭지/라이너; 젖병; 턱받이; 유아식 볼; 유아식 접시; 유아식 스푼; 수저류 세트; 시피컵
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > 離乳食用品: 哺乳瓶用乳首・取替えパック; 哺乳瓶; よだれかけ; 離乳食用ボウル; 離乳食用プレート; 離乳食用スプーン; 箸・カトラリーセット; フタ付きコップ
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Itens essenciais para alimentação: Bicos e revestimentos internos para mamadeira; Mamadeiras; Babadores; Tigelas; Pratos; Colheres; Conjuntos de talheres; Copos mágicos
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Pribor za hranjenje: Dude i obloge za dječje bočice; Dječje bočice; Podbradnici; Zdjelice; Tanjuri za jelo; Žlice za jelo; Setovi pribora za jelo; Čaša s poklopcem za malu djecu
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Посуда для кормления: Соски и вкладыши для детских бутылочек; Детские бутылочки; Слюнявчики; Миски для кормления; Тарелки для кормления; Ложки для кормления; Наборы столовых приборов; Кружки-непроливайки
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 喂养必需品: 婴儿奶瓶奶嘴/内衬; 婴儿奶瓶; 围嘴; 喂养碗; 喂养盘; 喂养勺; 刀叉匙餐具套装; 鸭嘴杯
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Zubehör für Babynahrung: Ein- und Aufsätze für Babyflaschen; Babyflaschen; Lätzchen; Schüsseln für Babynahrung; Teller für Babynahrung; Löffel für Babynahrung; Besteck-Sets; Lerntassen
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Feeding Essentials: Baby Bottle Nipples & Liners; Baby Bottles; Bibs; Feeding Bowls; Feeding Plates; Feeding Spoons; Flatware Sets; Sippy Cups
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Dụng cụ ăn dặm: Núm ti và túi lót bình sữa; Bình sữa em bé; Yếm; Bát ăn dặm; Đĩa ăn dặm; Thìa ăn dặm; Bộ dao thìa nĩa; Bình nước mỏ vịt
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Alimenti essenziali: Tettarelle e sacche usa e getta per biberon; Biberon; Bavaglini; Recipienti da cucina; Piatti; Cucchiai; Set di posate; Tazze per bimbi
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Απαραίτητα σκεύη σίτισης: Θηλές & επενδύσεις για μπιμπερό; Μπιμπερό; Σαλιάρες; Μπολ σίτισης; Πιάτα σίτισης; Κουτάλια σίτισης; Σετ μαχαιροπίρουνων; Ποτηράκια εκπαίδευσης